Utah statutes.
77-19-9.   Judgment of death not executed -- Order for execution.
(1)  If for any reason a judgment of death has not been executed and remains
in force, the court where the conviction was had, on application of the
prosecuting attorney, shall order the defendant to be brought before it or, if
the defendant is at large, issue a warrant for the defendant's apprehension.
(2)  When the defendant is brought before the court, it shall inquire into the
facts and, if no legal reason exists against the execution of judgment, the
court shall make an order requiring the executive director of the Department
of Corrections or the executive director's designee to ensure that the
judgment is executed on a specified day, which may not be fewer than 30 nor
more than 60 days after the court's order, and may not be a Sunday, Monday, or
a legal holiday, as defined in Section 63G-1-301.  The court shall also draw
and have delivered another warrant under Section 77-19-6.
(3)  The Department of Corrections shall determine the hour, within the
appointed day, at which the judgment is to be executed.
